Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-379
Cost of patient care; fraudulent transfers; effect.

In the absence of fraud, a patient and the patient's relatives shall be liable only to the extent of assessments actually made against them respectively, in accordance with sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379. For the purposes of sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379, it shall be deemed fraudulent for any patient or the patient's relatives to transfer any assets or property to another person for the purpose of affecting the determination of ability to pay. When it is determined that such a fraudulent transfer has been made, the department shall consider the value of such assets or property transferred in determining the ability to pay under section 83-368 or 83-369.

Laws 1969, c. 812, § 17, p. 3055;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 796;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 40.
July 18, 2026